Hawaii, session 2026, HB1601.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  Act 236, Session Laws of Hawaii 2025, is amended by amending section 42 to read as follows: "SECTION 42.  There is appropriated out of the general revenues of the State of Hawaii the sum of $4,250,000 or so much thereof as may be necessary for fiscal year 2026-2027 for the operations of the Hawaii invasive species council. The sum appropriated shall be expended by the department of [agriculture and biosecurity] land and natural resources for the purposes of this Act." SECTION 2.  Statutory material to be repealed is bracketed and stricken.  New statutory material is underscored. SECTION 3.  This Act shall take effect on July 1, 2026. INTRODUCED BY: _____________________________